Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1515.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE I-AADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURESSection 101-A. Insurance.(a) Prohibited conduct.--Subject to subsection (b), an insurer may not, based solely upon an insured's harboring or owning of a dog of a specific breed or mixture of breeds:123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (1) Refuse to issue or renew a homeowner's insurance policy of the insured.(2) Cancel a homeowner's insurance policy of the insured.(3) Charge or impose an increased premium or rate for a homeowner's insurance policy of the insured.(b) Construction.--Subsection (a) shall not be construed to prohibit an insurer from refusing to issue or renew a homeowner's insurance policy, canceling a homeowner's insurance policy or charging or imposing an increased premium or rate for a homeowner's insurance policy based upon the insured's harboring or owning of a dog of any breed or mixture of breeds that has been determined to be a dangerous dog in accordance with section 502-A.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Homeowner's insurance policy." A policy, contract or plan of casualty insurance that provides property and liability coverage to an insured."Insurer." A person licensed by the Insurance Department to provide a homeowner's insurance policy within this Commonwealth in accordance with the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.Section 2. The addition of section 101-A of the act shall apply to homeowner's insurance policies issued, renewed or modified on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1515PN1771 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728